Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 54.
PURCHASE OF PRINTING, STATIONERY AND SUPPLIES (CONST., ART. 19, § 15, REPEALED AND SECTION ADDED).

§ 1. Contracts given to lowest responsible bidder.

The printing, stationery, and supplies purchased by the General Assembly and other departments of government shall be under contracts given to the lowest responsible bidder, below such maximum price and under such regulations as shall be prescribed by law. No member or officer of any department of government shall in any way be interested in such contracts.

Publisher's Notes.

This Amendment was proposed by S.J.R. No. 6 (see Acts 1973, p. 2225) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on April 5, 1973. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 5, 1974, by a vote of 259,639 for and 210,830 against.

Const. Amend. 54, § 2 repealed Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 15.

Acts 1983, No. 760, § 1 read: “On the effective date of this Act, printing, stationery and supplies subject to Amendment 54 of the Arkansas Constitution shall be subject to the provisions of the Arkansas Preference Law, Act 482 of 1979 as amended.”